Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB691.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(d)(1) and (d.1)(1) of the act of September 30, 1983 (P.L.160, No.39), known as the Public Official Compensation Law, are amended to read:Section 4. Members of the General Assembly.* * *(d) Subsequent annual cost-of-living adjustment for members.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), for the 12-month period beginning December 1, 1997, through November 30, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 1998, and for each like 12-month period thereafter until November 30, 2024, the salary of the members of the General Assembly shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by applying the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area, for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current salary amounts. The percentage increase and the new salary amounts shall be determined jointly by the Chief Clerk of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall be published by them in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within ten days of the date such determination is made.* * *(d.1) Subsequent annual cost-of-living adjustment for officers and leaders.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), for the 12-month period beginning December 1, 1997, through November 30, 1998, and for each like 12-month period thereafter until November 30, 2024, the additional compensation of the officers and leaders of the General Assembly shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by applying the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area, for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor 20250HB0691PN0707 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current compensation. The percentage increase and the new compensation amounts shall be determined jointly by the Chief Clerk of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 20 days immediately prior to each cost-of-living increase taking effect.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0691PN0707 - 3 - 1234567891011